Utah statutes.
73-5-9.   Powers of state engineer as to waste, pollution, or contamination
of waters.
(1)  To prevent waste, loss, pollution, or contamination of any waters whether
above or below the ground, the state engineer may require the repair or
construction of head gates or other devices on ditches or canals, and the
repair or installation of caps, valves, or casings on any well or tunnel or
the plugging or filling thereof to accomplish the purposes of this section.
(2)  Any requirement made by the state engineer in accordance with this
section shall be executed by and at the cost and expense of the owner, lessee
or person having control of such diverting works affected.
(3)  If within ten days after notice of such requirement as provided in this
section, the owner, lessee or person having control of the water affected, has
not commenced to carry out such requirement, or if he has commenced to comply
therewith but shall not thereafter proceed diligently to complete the work,
the state engineer may forbid the use of water from such source until the user
thereof shall comply with such requirement.
(4)  Failure to comply with any requirement made by the state engineer under
this section is a crime punishable under Section 73-2-27 if the failure to
comply is knowing or intentional.
(5)  Each day that such violation is permitted to continue shall constitute a
separate offense.
